Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.100

Hearings—Contesting determination that infraction committed—Appeal.

(1) A hearing held for the purpose of contesting the determination that a civil infraction has been committed shall be without a jury and shall be recorded in the manner provided for in courts of limited jurisdiction.

(2) The court may consider the notice of civil infraction and any other written report made under oath submitted by the enforcement officer who issued the notice or whose written statement was the basis for the issuance of the notice in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the hearing. The person named in the notice may request the court for issuance of subpoena of witnesses, including the enforcement officer who issued the notice, and has the right to present evidence and examine witnesses present in court.

(3) The burden of proof is upon the state to establish the commission of the civil infraction by a preponderance of the evidence.

(4) After consideration of the evidence and argument, the court shall determine whether the civil infraction was committed. Where it has not been established that the civil infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in the court's records. Where it has been established that the civil infraction was committed, an appropriate order shall be entered in the court's records.

(5) An appeal from the court's determination or order shall be to the superior court in the manner provided by the Rules for Appeal of Decisions of Courts of Limited Jurisdiction. The decision of the superior court is subject only to discretionary review pursuant to the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

[ 1987 c 456 s 18.]